District of Columbia statutes.
38-2561.15

Rules.

(a)

Not later than 90 days after March 14, 2007, the Mayor shall issue regulations to implement the powers and duties assigned to the Mayor by this chapter.

(b)

Not later than 90 days after March 14, 2007, DCPS shall issue regulations to implement its powers and duties pursuant to this chapter.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-269, § 115, 54 DCR 841
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 115 of Placement of Students with Disabilities in Nonpublic Schools Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-667, December 28, 2006, 54 DCR 1134).
Delegation of Rule Making Authority to the District of Columbia State Superintendent of Education to Establish Rate Setting Rules for Nonpublic Schools as Required by the “Placement of Students with Disabilities in Nonpublic Schools Amendment Act of 2006”, effective March 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-269, 54 DCR 841, see Mayor’s order 2007-149, June 28, 2007 ( 54 DCR 9604).